Rhode Island statutes. Title 36 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 10 Retirement System — Contributions and Benefits
36-10-36.
Post-retirement employment.

On and after July 7, 1994, no member who has retired under the provisions of title 16, 36, or 45 may be employed or reemployed by any state agency or department unless any and all retirement benefits to which he or she may be entitled by virtue of the provisions of title 16, 36, or 45 are suspended for the duration of any employment or reemployment. No additional service credits shall be granted for any post-retirement employment or reemployment and no deductions shall be taken from an individual’s salary for retirement contribution. Notice of any such post-retirement employment or reemployment shall be sent monthly to the retirement board by the employing agency or department and by the retired member.

Any member who has retired under the provisions of title 16, 36, or 45 may be employed or reemployed by any municipality within the state that has accepted the provisions of chapter 21 of title 45 and participates in the municipal employees’ retirement system for a period of not more than seventy-five (75) working days or one hundred fifty (150) half days with half-day pay in any one calendar year without any forfeiture or reduction of any retirement benefits and allowances the member is receiving, or may receive, as a retired member. Pension payments shall be suspended whenever this period is exceeded. No additional contributions shall be taken, and no additional service credits shall be granted, for this service. Notice of this employment or reemployment shall be sent monthly to the retirement board by the employer and by the retired member.

Any member who has retired under the provisions of title 16, 36, or 45 may be employed or reemployed by any municipality within the state that has not accepted the provisions of chapter 21 of title 45 and that does not participate in the municipal employees’ retirement system.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section:

Any retired member of the system shall be permitted to serve as an elected mayor, the town administrator, the city administrator, the town manager, the city manager, the chief administrative officer, or the chief executive officer of any city or town, city or town council member, school committee member, or unpaid member of any part-time state board or commission or member of any part-time municipal board or commission, and shall continue to be eligible for, and receive, the retirement allowance for service other than that as a mayor, administrator, council member, school committee member, or member of any state board or commission or member of any part-time municipal board or commission; provided, however, that no additional service credits shall be granted for any service under this subsection;

Any retired member, who retired from service at any state college, university, state school, or who retired from service as a teacher under the provisions of title 16, or who retired from service under title 36 or title 45, may be employed or reemployed, on a part-time basis, by any state college, university, or state school for the purpose of providing classroom instruction, academic advising of students, and/or coaching. Compensation shall be provided at a level not to exceed the salary provided to other faculty members employed under a collective bargaining agreement at the institution. In no event shall “part-time” mean gross pay of more than eighteen thousand dollars ($18,000) in any one calendar year. Any retired member who provides such instruction or service shall do so without forfeiture or reduction of any retirement benefit or allowance; provided, however, that no additional service credits shall be granted for any service under this subsection;

Any retired member who retired from service as a teacher under the provisions of title 16, or as a state employee who, while an active state employee, was certified to teach driver education by the department of elementary and secondary education or by the board of governors for higher education, may be employed or reemployed, on a part-time basis, by the department of elementary and secondary education or by the board of governors of higher education for the purpose of providing classroom instruction in driver education courses in accordance with §

31-10-19

and/or motorcycle driver education courses in accordance with §

31-10.1-1.1

. In no event shall “part-time” mean gross pay of more than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) in any one calendar year. Any retired teacher who provides that instruction shall do so without forfeiture or reduction of any retirement benefit or allowance the retired teacher is receiving as a retired teacher; provided, however, that no additional service credits shall be granted for any service under this subsection;

Any retired member who retired from service as a registered nurse may be employed or reemployed, on a per-diem basis, for the purpose of providing professional nursing care and/or services at a state-operated facility in Rhode Island, including employment as a faculty member of a nursing program at a state-operated college or university. In no event shall “part-time” mean gross pay of more than a period of seventy-five (75) working days or one hundred fifty (150) half days with half pay in any one calendar year. Any retired nurse who provides such care and/or services shall do so without forfeiture or reduction of any retirement benefit or allowance the retired nurse is receiving as a retired nurse; provided, however, that no additional service credits shall be granted for any service under this subsection. Pension payments shall be suspended whenever this period is exceeded. No additional contributions shall be taken and no additional service credits shall be granted for this service. Notice of this employment or reemployment shall be sent monthly to the retirement board by the employer and by the retired member;

Any retired member who, at the time of passage of this section, serves as a general magistrate within the family court and thereafter retires from judicial service, may be employed or reemployed by the family court to perform such services as a general magistrate of the family court as the chief judge of the family court shall prescribe without any forfeiture or reduction of any retirement benefits and allowances that he or she is receiving or may receive. For any such services or assignments performed after retirement, the general magistrate shall receive no compensation whatsoever, either monetary or in kind. No additional contributions shall be taken and no additional service credits shall be granted for this service;

Any retired district court clerk/magistrate or magistrate of the district court who shall subsequently be assigned to perform service in accordance with §

8-8-8.1

or §

8-8-16.2(e)

, may be employed or reemployed by the district court to perform such services as a magistrate as the chief judge of the district court shall prescribe without any forfeiture or reduction of any retirement benefits and allowance that he or she is receiving or may receive. For any such services or assignment performed after retirement, the district court clerk/magistrate or magistrate shall receive, in addition to his or her retirement pension, the difference in pay and fringe benefits between his or her retirement pension, and that of a sitting magistrate of the district court with comparable state service time. No additional contributions shall be taken and no additional service credits shall be granted for this service; and

Any retired member of the system shall be permitted to serve as a municipal employee without any forfeiture or reduction of any retirement benefits and allowances that he or she is receiving or may receive; provided, that said member shall be appointed by and serves at the pleasure of the highest elected chief executive officer, as defined in §

45-9-2

, in any city or town subject to the provisions of chapter 9 of title 45 entitled “Budget Commissions” relating to the appointment of a fiscal overseer, budget commission, receiver, and/or financial advisor. Provided further, that no additional service credits shall be granted for any service under this subsection.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 6, art. 30, § 2; P.L. 1994, ch. 142, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 245, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 211, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 314, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 349, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 468, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 495, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 333, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 202, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 263, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 217, § 2; P.L. 2003, ch. 361, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 379, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 474, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 495, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 1, § 2; P.L. 2009, ch. 2, § 2; P.L. 2009, ch. 3, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 363, § 30; P.L. 2012, ch. 207, § 2; P.L. 2012, ch. 236, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 245, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 268, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 322, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 181, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 279, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 406, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 416, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 433, § 2, effective June 30, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 434, § 2, effective June 30, 2022.

36-10-36.1.
Post-retirement employment related to COVID-19.

Notwithstanding any public or general law, or rule or regulation to the contrary, any teacher, administrator, or staff member who has retired under the provisions of title 16, 36, or 45 may, as part of the public health crisis caused by COVID-19, exceed the seventy-five-day (75) cap on post-retirement employment upon:

A determination by the local education authority that there exists a specialized need, within their authority, to fill positions on a temporary basis, that may exceed the seventy-five-day (75) cap on post-retirement employment;

There exists a good-faith basis that those retired teachers, administrators, and staff members being asked to exceed the seventy-five-day (75) cap on post-retirement employment possess the skills, training, and knowledge necessary to help address the public health crisis caused by COVID-19; and

The local education authority has notified the state retirement board that it has determined that exceeding the seventy-five-day (75) cap on post-retirement employment is necessary to help address the public health crisis caused by COVID-19.

Any teacher, administrator, or staff member who has retired under the provisions of title 16, 36, or 45, and has been employed or re-employed under the provisions of this section, shall not be entitled to additional service credits for such employment.

Unless extended by the general assembly, this section shall sunset upon the conclusion of the 2021-2022 school year.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 7, § 2, effective March 28, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 8, § 2, effective March 28, 2022.

36-10-37.
Retirement benefits for certain general state officers.

Any person who has served as governor, lieutenant governor, attorney general, secretary of state, or general treasurer for a period of twenty (20) consecutive years shall be entitled, upon his or her resignation or retirement, to receive annually during his or her life a sum equal to three quarters (3/4) of the salary he or she was receiving at the time of his or her resignation or retirement. This section shall not apply to any person initially elected as governor, lieutenant governor, attorney general, secretary of state, or general treasurer on or after July 1, 2012.

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 142, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 408, § 7; P.L. 2011, ch. 409, § 7.

36-10-38.
Combined service credits of general state officers.

When a person has combined and transferred service credits, earned as a member of the Rhode Island municipal retirement system, to the state retirement system, and the service amounts to not less than twenty (20) years in the aggregate as a general state officer and/or as an elected officer of a town or city, as defined in §

45-21-2

, the service credits of the person may be deemed to be consecutive service to the state as provided by this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 249, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 142, § 6.

36-10-39.
Fiscal impact of proposed legislation impacting the retirement system.

Proposed legislation which directly impacts the retirement system can potentially affect the benefits of all plan participants and beneficiaries. Since it is in the best interests of plan participants and beneficiaries to determine the financial consequences of any proposed legislation which would directly impact the state’s liability to the retirement system, such legislation shall not be approved by the general assembly unless an explanatory statement or note, prepared and paid for by the employees’ retirement system of the state of Rhode Island is appended to the proposed legislation which actuarially calculates, based upon approved retirement board assumptions, the projected twenty (20) year cost of the proposed legislation. These statements or notes shall be known as “pension impact notes,” and they shall accompany each such bill or resolution prior to consideration of the house in which the bill or resolution originated. The reasonable cost of preparing pension impact notes shall be charged as an administrative expense and paid from the retirement system’s restricted receipts account established pursuant to §

36-8-10.1

. Only the chair of the senate committee on finance with the approval of the president of the senate can request a pension impact note on proposed legislation that originates in the senate. Only the chair of the house committee on finance with the approval of the speaker of the house can request a pension impact note on proposed legislation that originates in the house. The governor can request a pension impact note on proposed legislation recommended in the appropriation acts required by §§

35-3-7

or

35-3-8

. This section shall be in addition to the requirements of chapter 12 of title 22.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 139, § 8; P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 23, § 2.

36-10-40.
Domestic partner — Definition.

For purposes of this chapter, “domestic partner” shall be defined as a person who, prior to the decedent’s death, was in an exclusive, intimate and committed relationship with the decedent, and who certifies by affidavit that their relationship met the following qualifications:

Both partners were at least eighteen (18) years of age and were mentally competent to contract;

Neither partner was married to anyone else;

Partners were not related by blood to a degree which would prohibit marriage in the state of Rhode Island;

Partners resided together and had resided together for at least one year at the time of death; and

Partners were financially interdependent as evidenced by at least two (2) of the following:

Domestic partnership agreement or relationship contract;

Joint mortgage or joint ownership of primary residence;

Two (2) of: (A) joint ownership of motor vehicle; (B) joint checking account; (C) joint credit account; (D) joint lease; and/or

The domestic partner had been designated as a beneficiary for the decedent’s will, retirement contract or life insurance.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 510, § 12.